Utah statutes.
53A-8a-602.   Educator's eligibility for a wage increase.

An educator, as defined in Section 53A-6-103, may not advance on an adopted salary schedule if the educator's rating on the most recent evaluation is at the second lowest level of an evaluation instrument that differentiates among four levels of performance as described in Section 53A-8a-405, unless the educator:

(1)  is a provisional educator; or

(2)  is in the first year of an assignment, including a new subject, grade level, or school.



Enacted by Chapter 425, 2012 General Session

